Washington statutes.
RCW 36.60.130

Establishment, modification, or dissolution of district—Alternate method—Determination by county legislative authority.

Following the hearing, the county legislative authority shall determine by resolution whether the area proposed shall establish, modify the boundaries, or dissolve the county rail district. They may include all or any portion of the proposed area but may not include any property not described in the petition.

[ 1986 c 26 s 4.]